Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-5806
Applicability of act.

The Nebraska Advantage Research and Development Act shall be operative for all tax years beginning or deemed to begin on or after January 1, 2006, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended. No business firm shall be allowed to first claim the credit for any tax year beginning or deemed to begin after December 31, 2033, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.

Laws 2005, LB 312, § 64;

Laws 2009, LB164, § 10;

Laws 2014, LB1067, § 3;

Laws 2015, LB538, § 14;

Laws 2016, LB1022, § 10;

Laws 2023, LB727, § 96.